Utah statutes.
75-2-210.   Personal liability of recipients.

(1)  Only original recipients of the decedent's nonprobate transfers to others, and the donees of the recipients of the decedent's nonprobate transfers to others, to the extent the donees have the property or its proceeds, are liable to make a proportional contribution toward satisfaction of the surviving spouse's elective-share or supplemental elective-share amount.  A person liable to make contribution may choose to give up the proportional part of the decedent's nonprobate transfers to him or to pay the value of the amount for which he is liable.

(2)  If any section or subsection of this part is preempted by federal law with respect to a payment, an item of property, or any other benefit included in the decedent's nonprobate transfers to others, a person who, not for value, receives the payment, item of property, or any other benefit is obligated to return the payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally liable for the amount of the payment or the value of that item of property or benefit, as provided in Section 75-2-209, to the person who would have been entitled to it were that section or subsection not preempted.

